Utah statutes.
77-32-601.   Establishment of Indigent Aggravated Murder Defense Trust Fund
-- Use of fund -- Compensation for indigent legal defense from fund.
(1)  For purposes of this part, "fund" means the Indigent Aggravated Murder
Defense Trust Fund.
(2)  There is established a private-purpose trust fund known as the "Indigent
Aggravated Murder Defense Trust Fund" which shall be nonlapsing and shall be
disbursed by the Division of Finance at the direction of the board and subject
to this chapter.
(3)  The fund consists of:
(a)  monies received from participating counties as provided in Sections
77-32-602 and 77-32-603;
(b)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature as provided in Section
77-32-603; and
(c)  interest and earnings from the investment of fund monies.
(4)  Fund monies shall be invested by the state treasurer with the earnings
and interest accruing to the fund.
(5)  The fund shall be used to assist participating counties with financial
resources, as provided in Subsection (6), to fulfill their constitutional and
statutory mandates for the provision of an adequate defense for indigents
prosecuted for the violation of state laws in cases involving aggravated
murder.
(6)  Monies allocated to or deposited in this fund shall be used only:
(a)  to reimburse participating counties for expenditures made for an attorney
appointed to represent an indigent, other than a state inmate in a state
prison, prosecuted for aggravated murder in a participating county; and
(b)  for administrative costs pursuant to Section 77-32-401.
